Nevada, session 83, SB45.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 388.395 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.395 1. The board of trustees of a school district or the
governing body of a charter school may apply to the State Board of
Education for a grant for a program of career and technical
education, to be paid for from the remainder of state money
described in subsection 3 of NRS 388.392.
2. The State Board of Education shall review all applications
submitted pursuant to subsection 1 and award grants based on the
criteria established by regulation of the State Board of Education.
3. The proportion of the total amount awarded pursuant to
subsection 2 to a school district or charter school during a fiscal year
must not exceed the proportion of the enrollment of pupils in
advanced courses within programs of career and technical
education in the school district or charter school during the previous
fiscal year, as compared to the enrollments of pupils in advanced
courses within programs of career and technical education
throughout the State during the previous fiscal year.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Advanced course” means:
(1) A CTE concentrator course;
(2) A work-based learning program pursuant to
NRS 389.167;
(3) An activity for pupils to earn industry-recognized
credentials, as identified by the Governor’s Office of Workforce
Innovation pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 4 of
NRS 232.975;
(4) A dual credit course in a program of career and
technical education; or
(5) A course in a program of career and technical
education that requires the completion of a CTE concentrator
course as a prerequisite for enrollment.
(b) “CTE concentrator” has the meaning ascribed to it in 20
U.S.C. § 2302(12).
(c) “CTE concentrator course” means a course within a
program of career and technical education which may be used, in
combination with another course, to meet the course requirements
to be a CTE concentrator.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 2. NRS 389.167 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.167 1. A pupil enrolled at a public school must be
allowed to apply one or more credits toward the total number of
credits required for graduation from high school if the pupil
successfully completes the number of hours in a work-based
learning program required by regulation of the State Board to earn
such credits. Any credits earned for successful completion of a
work-based learning program must be applied toward the pupil’s
elective course credits and not toward a course that is required for
graduation from high school.
2. The board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school may offer a work-based learning program
upon application to and with the approval of the Superintendent of
Public Instruction. An application to offer a work-based learning
program must include, without limitation:
(a) The fields, trades or occupations in which a work-based
learning program will be offered.
(b) The qualifications of a pupil to participate in the work-based
learning program. Such qualifications must allow a majority of
pupils to be eligible to participate in the work-based learning
program.
(c) A description of the process that will be used by pupils to
apply to participate in a work-based learning program.
(d) A description of the manner in which participation in a
work-based learning program and completion of the requirements of
a work-based learning program will be verified.
(e) A description of the manner in which the performance of a
pupil who participates in the work-based learning program will be
evaluated, which must include, without limitation, an on-site
evaluation of the performance of the pupil.
3. Upon approval by the Superintendent of Public Instruction
of an application to offer a work-based learning program submitted
pursuant to subsection 2, the board of trustees or the governing body
shall:
(a) Designate an employee of the school district or charter
school, as applicable, to serve as a work-based learning coordinator
to coordinate and oversee work-based learning programs. Such an
employee must ensure that each business, agency or organization
that will offer employment and supervision of a pupil as part of the
work-based learning program is suitable for participation in a work-
based learning program.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(b) Establish and maintain a list of businesses, agencies and
organizations that have been found suitable by the work-based
learning coordinator pursuant to paragraph (a).
4. To receive approval from the Superintendent of Public
Instruction to offer a work-based learning program, the work-based
learning program must include, without limitation, requirements
that:
(a) A detailed training agreement and training plan be completed
for each pupil participating in the work-based learning program for
credit that identifies the specific tasks in which the pupil will
participate that will develop competency of the pupil in the
workplace;
(b) A pupil participating in the work-based learning program be
allowed to leave the public school in which he or she is enrolled
during the school day to participate in such a program;
(c) Participation by a pupil in the work-based learning program
will develop a broad range of skills and will allow a pupil to focus
on his or her chosen career pathway; and
(d) Training be completed by each pupil participating in the
work-based learning program on:
(1) Identifying and reporting harassment in the workplace;
(2) Developing and maintaining healthy relationships in the
workplace; and
(3) Identifying the signs of a person engaging in predatory
conduct to prepare a pupil for sexual activity or to foster an
inappropriate personal or professional relationship with a pupil,
including, without limitation, through communicating or attempting
to befriend or establish a relationship or other connection with a
parent or legal guardian of a pupil in furtherance of such conduct.
5. A school district or charter school may allow a pupil who
successfully completes a work-based learning program to earn dual
credit for participation in the work-based learning program.
6. On or before January 15 of each odd-numbered year, the
board of trustees of a school district and the governing body of a
charter school that offers a work-based learning program shall
prepare a report concerning the manner in which the work-based
learning program has been carried out and submit the report to the
State Board and the Legislature. The report must include, without
limitation [:
(a) The number of pupils participating in the work-based
learning program; and
(b) The types of work-based learning offered through the work-
based learning program.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
7. The number of pupils participating in the work-based
learning program reported pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 6]
, the information required to be included in the report submitted
pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 2323(b)(4)(B), which must be
disaggregated on the basis of the [following] characteristics [:
(a) Pupils who are American Indian or Alaska Native, Asian,
Black or African American, Hispanic or Latino, Native Hawaiian or
Pacific Islander, white or two or more races;
(b) Gender of pupils;
(c) Pupils who are migrants; and
(d) Pupils] set forth in 20 U.S.C. § 2323(b)(4)(B)(ii), including,
without limitation, the number of pupils who are members of
special populations, as defined in 20 U.S.C. § 2302(48).
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)